Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.045

Inactive licenses.

A licensed osteopathic physician and surgeon who desires to leave the active practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery in this state may secure from the secretary an inactive license. The administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for an inactive license shall be determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The holder of an inactive license may reactivate his or her license to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in accordance with rules adopted by the board.

[ 1996 c 191 s 35; 1991 c 160 s 4.]